Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.141

Void in candidacy.

A void in candidacy occurs when an election has been scheduled and no valid declaration of candidacy has been filed for the position or all persons filing such valid declarations of candidacy have died or been disqualified.

[ 2011 c 349 s 9; 2004 c 271 s 162.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.